Washington statutes.
RCW 19.335.020

Prohibited acts or practices.

A person may not engage in the following acts or practices:

(1) Receiving compensation for advising or assisting another person with a veterans' benefit matter, except as permitted under Title 38 of the United States Code;

(2) Using financial or other personal information gathered in order to prepare documents for, or otherwise represent the interests of, another in a veterans' benefit matter for purposes of trade or commerce;

(3) Receiving compensation for referring another person to a person accredited by the United States department of veterans affairs;

(4) Representing, either directly or by implication, either orally or in writing, that the receipt of a certain level of veterans' benefits is guaranteed.

[ 2014 c 67 s 3.]